South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5008.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "South Carolina Fostering Futures Act." SECTION 2.  Chapter 111, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 11 Free Tuition for Certain Current and Former Foster Youth Section 59-111-910.  (A) All state-supported colleges and universities, as defined in Section 59-103-5, shall waive the payment of tuition and fees for certain current and former foster youth who are enrolled in a program of study for an undergraduate certificate, diploma, or first bachelor's degree. (B) For purposes of this section, "certain current and former foster youth" means an individual who is not older than twenty-five years of age and: (1) was in the legal custody of the Department of Social Services (DSS) on the day of the individual's eighteenth birthday before exiting foster care; (2) is currently in the legal custody of DSS under extended foster care; (3) was adopted from DSS foster care at age thirteen or later; or (4) was in the legal custody of DSS foster care for three or more cumulative years. (C) Eligibility for the waiver under this section may continue through completion of the first bachelor's degree or until the eligible student reaches the age of twenty-six, whichever comes first. A double major completed within a single bachelor's degree awarded must be treated as one degree for purposes of this section. A student is not required to maintain continuous enrollment to retain eligibility. The waiver must remain available upon transfer between public institutions if the student remains otherwise eligible. (D) The tuition waiver required by this section must apply to: (1) tuition and fees only, and may not be construed to compel the waiver of room, board, books, or nonmandatory course-specific fees; (2) tuition for summer terms, winter, or other shortened academic terms; and (3) tuition for institutionally sponsored, for-credit study abroad programs. (E) A public institution of higher education may require documentation necessary to confirm eligibility under this section, including verification of DSS custody or adoption status. An institution only may ask for this verification once for each student seeking eligibility confirmation. (F) Each public institution of higher education that offers student housing shall provide students eligible under this section with mandatory first priority status to register for university-owned or university-affiliated housing. Institutions must offer housing to students eligible under this section during academic or holiday breaks, and over the summer if it is available to any student population. The priority status required in this subsection must continue for each term of enrollment through credential or degree completion if the student remains otherwise eligible. (G) Each public institution of higher education shall provide priority access to federal work-study positions, and any campus-based student employment programs administered by the institution, for students eligible under this section. The priority status required in this subsection must continue for each term of enrollment through credential or degree completion if the student remains otherwise eligible. (H) Each public institution of higher education shall designate at least one staff member to serve as an institutional liaison for students eligible under this section. The liaison must provide support and guidance related to college entry processes, financial aid, the long-term responsibilities of student loans, campus-based supports and services, and career exploration and planning. Each institution shall publicly identify its liaisons and make contact information for the liaisons readily accessible on the official website of the institution. (I) Each public institution of higher education shall report annually before July first to DSS deidentified, aggregate summary data regarding students eligible under this section. The annual report must include, at a minimum: (1) the number of eligible students enrolled; (2) the academic programs or majors in which such students are enrolled; and (3) academic progress of eligible students enrolled. An external evaluator must be given access to institutional data to summarize waiver efficacy. (J) Each public institution of higher education shall consider students eligible under this section to be financially independent for purposes of federal and state financial aid classification, including but not limited to, 20 U.S.C. section 1087vv(d). An eligible student may not be required to provide parental information or documentation of parental income. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----